Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 28 Unclaimed Property
18-28-210. Custody by state — Recovery by holder — Defense of holder.

(a)

In this section, payment or delivery is made in “good faith” if:

(1)

payment or delivery was made in a reasonable attempt to comply with this subchapter;

(2)

the holder was not then in breach of a fiduciary obligation with respect to the property and had a reasonable basis for believing, based on the facts then known, that the property was presumed abandoned; and

(3)

there is no showing that the records under which the payment or delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial standards of practice.

(b)

Upon payment or delivery of property to the administrator, the state assumes custody and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. A holder who pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith is relieved of all liability arising thereafter with respect to the property.

(c)

A holder who has paid money to the administrator pursuant to this subchapter may subsequently make payment to a person reasonably appearing to the holder to be entitled to payment. Upon a filing by the holder of proof of payment and proof that the payee was entitled to the payment, the administrator shall promptly reimburse the holder for the payment without imposing a fee or other charge. If reimbursement is sought for a payment made on a negotiable instrument, including a traveler's check or money order, the holder must be reimbursed upon filing proof that the instrument was duly presented and that payment was made to a person who reasonably appeared to be entitled to payment. The holder must be reimbursed for payment made even if the payment was made to a person whose claim was barred under §18-28-219(a).

(d)

A holder who has delivered property other than money to the administrator pursuant to this subchapter may reclaim the property if it is still in the possession of the administrator, without paying any fee or other charge, upon filing proof that the apparent owner has claimed the property from the holder.

(e)

The administrator may accept a holder's affidavit as sufficient proof of the holder's right to recover money and property under this section.

(f)

If a holder pays or delivers property to the administrator in good faith and thereafter another person claims the property from the holder or another state claims the money or property under its laws relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the administrator, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any liability on the claim resulting from payment or delivery of the property to the administrator.

(g)

Property removed from a safe deposit box or other safekeeping depository is received by the administrator subject to the holder's right to be reimbursed for the cost of the opening and to any valid lien or contract providing for the holder to be reimbursed for unpaid rent or storage charges. The administrator shall reimburse the holder out of the proceeds remaining after deducting the expense incurred by the administrator in selling the property.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 10.

18-28-211. Crediting of dividends, interest, and increments to owner's account.

If property other than money is delivered to the administrator under this subchapter, the owner is entitled to receive from the administrator any income or gain realized or accruing on the property at or before liquidation or conversion of the property into money. If the property was an interest-bearing demand, savings, or time deposit, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, the administrator shall not pay interest.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 11; 2005, No. 175, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “shall not pay interest” for “shall pay interest at a rate of six percent (6%) a year or any lesser rate the property earned while in the possession of the holder” in the second sentence and deleted the former last two sentences.

18-28-212. Public sale of abandoned property.

(a)(1)

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the administrator, within three (3) years after the receipt of abandoned property, shall sell it to the highest bidder at public sale at a location in the state which in the judgment of the administrator affords the most favorable market for the property. The administrator may decline the highest bid and reoffer the property for sale if the administrator considers the bid to be insufficient. The administrator need not offer the property for sale if the administrator considers that the probable cost of sale will exceed the proceeds of the sale.

(2)

A sale held under this section must be preceded by a single publication of notice, at least three (3) weeks before sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property is to be sold. However, the administrator is not required to publish notice under this section if the abandoned property will be sold through an Internet auction.

(b)(1)(A)

Securities listed on an established stock exchange shall be sold at prices prevailing on the exchange at the time of sale.

(B)

Other securities may be sold over the counter at prices prevailing at the time of sale or by a reasonable method selected by the administrator.

(2)

The administrator may sell securities upon receipt of the securities from the holder.

(3)(A)

A person making a claim under this subchapter is entitled to receive the:

(i)

Securities delivered by the holder to the administrator if the securities still remain in the custody of the administrator; or

(ii)

Proceeds received from the sale of the securities, less any fees and expenses incurred from the sale.

(B)

A person may not maintain an action or bring a proceeding for any appreciation or depreciation in the value of the securities that may occur after delivery by the holder to the administrator against:

(i)

The state;

(ii)

The administrator;

(iii)

The holder;

(iv)

A securities transfer agent;

(v)

An auctioneer; or

(vi)

An agent acting for or on behalf of the holder or administrator.

(c)

A purchaser of property at a sale conducted by the administrator pursuant to this subchapter takes the property free of all claims of the owner or previous holder and of all persons claiming through or under them. The administrator shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of ownership.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 12; 2005, No. 175, § 2; 2019, No. 492, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision designations in (a); and added the second sentence in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment subdivided (b) into (b)(1) and (b)(2); rewrote (b)(2) and added (b)(3); and made stylistic changes.

18-28-213. Deposit of funds. — Definition.

(a)(1)

The funds received under this subchapter, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property, shall be deposited by the administrator into a special trust fund to be known as the “Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund”, from which he or she shall make prompt payment of claims allowed by him or her as provided under this subchapter.

(2)

The funds shall be deposited into accounts in one (1) or more financial institutions authorized to do business in this state and may then be transferred into the State Treasury Money Management Trust to be administered in accordance with the laws of this state.

(3)(A)

Before making the deposit, the administrator shall record:

(i)

The name and last known address of each person appearing from the holder's reports to be entitled to the abandoned property;

(ii)

The name and last known address of each insured or annuitant; and

(iii)

The policy or contract number, the name of the life insurance corporation, and the amount due under each policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance corporation.

(B)

The record shall be available for public inspection at all reasonable business hours.

(b)

At the end of each fiscal year, the administrator shall withdraw from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund an amount necessary to reimburse the State Central Services Fund, or its successor fund or fund account, for moneys expended for personal services and operating expenses of administering and enforcing this subchapter.

(c)(1)(A)(i)

At least one (1) time each fiscal year, the administrator shall transfer to the treasurer of the reporting county all funds collected from that county that have not been claimed and that have been held for a full three (3) years.

(ii)

The funds received by the treasurer shall be deposited into the general fund of the reporting county.

(iii)

The reporting county may use the funds for any purpose for which it may use general revenues.

(B)(i)

After the administrator returns funds to the county, the state is released from its indemnity of the county under §18-28-210(b) and (f).

(ii)

The county receiving the funds shall maintain an accounting of the funds in perpetuity, unless payment upon a valid claim is made.

(iii)

If the rightful owner or the owner's heirs or assigns ever appear and petition the county for the return of the funds after providing proof of ownership, the county shall pay the funds to the rightful owner from the general fund of the county.

(iv)

For purposes of this section, “proof of ownership” means a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that the person petitioning the county is, in fact, the rightful owner, heir, or assignee.

(2)

At least one (1) time each fiscal year, the administrator shall transfer to the general revenues of the state all remaining funds that have been collected and held for a full three (3) years, less the amount transferred to the State Central Services Fund, or its successor fund or fund account, as required by this subchapter.

(d)

Each bank depository of unclaimed property funds shall secure the funds to the extent of the amount of the balance of the funds any time on hand and in such manner as the administrator shall require.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 13; 2001, No. 1261, § 2; 2003, No. 1033, § 1; 2011, No. 616, § 1; 2019, No. 325, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2012, No. 213, § 10, provided: “FUND TRANSFER. On the effective date of this Act and notwithstanding the provisions of A.C.A. §18-28-213 (c)(2) regarding the transfer of funds from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the general revenues of the state, the Auditor of State shall transfer on his books and those of the State Treasurer and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the State Central Services Fund as a direct revenue for the Auditor of State to be used exclusively for grants to implement a statewide Enhanced9-1-1 System.”

Acts 2012, Nos. 271 and 287, § 8, provided: “FUND TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, and notwithstanding the provisions of A.C.A. 18-28-213 (c)(2) regarding the transfer of funds from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the general revenues of the state, the Auditor of State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Chief Fiscal Officer of State the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the Mid-South Community College Fund to be expensed from the Arkansas Delta Training and Education Consortium, the Arkansas Delta Training and Education Consortium Partners, and the University Center Partners appropriations.”

Acts 2012, Nos. 271 and 287, § 9, provided: “FUND TRANSFER. Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, and notwithstanding the provisions of A.C.A. 18-28-213 (c)(2) regarding the transfer of funds from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the general revenues of the state, the Auditor of State shall transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Chief Fiscal Officer of State the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund to the Higher Education Grants Fund Account to provide additional funding for scholarships.”

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (c) as present (c)(2); added (c)(1); and, in (c)(2), substituted “one (1) time” for “once,” and inserted “remaining.”

The 2003 amendment, in (c)(1)(A), substituted “all funds” for “fifty percent (50%) of any funds” and deleted “under §14-24-120” following the second instance of “county”; redesignated former (c)(1)(B) as present (c)(1)(B)(i) and substituted “funds” for “the fifty percent (50%)” and deleted “fifty percent (50%) of” following “the state is released from”; and added (c)(1)(B)(ii) through (c)(1)(B)(iv).

The 2011 amendment inserted “treasurer of the” in (c)(1)(A)(i); added (c)(1)(A)(ii) and (iii); inserted “unless payment upon a valid claim is made” at the end of (c)(1)(B)(ii); and inserted “from the general fund of the county” at the end of (c)(1)(B)(iii).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a).

18-28-214. Claim of another state to recover property.

(a)

After property has been paid or delivered to the administrator under this subchapter, another state may recover the property if:

(1)

the property was paid or delivered to the custody of this state because the records of the holder did not reflect a last known location of the apparent owner within the borders of the other state and the other state establishes that the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property was last known to be located within the borders of that state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

(2)

the property was paid or delivered to the custody of this state because the laws of the other state did not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, and under the laws of that state subsequently enacted the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

(3)

the records of the holder were erroneous in that they did not accurately identify the owner of the property and the last known location of the owner within the borders of another state and under the laws of that state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;

(4)

the property was subjected to custody by this state under §18-28-204(6) and under the laws of the state of domicile of the holder the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state; or

(5)

the property is a sum payable on a traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument that was purchased in the other state and delivered into the custody of this state under §18-28-204(7), and under the laws of the other state the property has escheated or become subject to a claim of abandonment by that state.

(b)

A claim of another state to recover escheated or abandoned property must be presented in a form prescribed by the administrator, who shall decide the claim within ninety (90) days after it is presented. The administrator shall allow the claim upon determining that the other state is entitled to the abandoned property under subsection (a).

(c)

The administrator shall require another state, before recovering property under this section, to agree to indemnify this state and its officers and employees against any liability on a claim to the property.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 14.

18-28-215. Filing claim with administrator — Handling of claims by administrator.

(a)

A person, excluding another state, claiming property paid or delivered to the administrator may file a claim on a form prescribed by the administrator and verified by the claimant.

(b)

Within ninety (90) days after a claim is filed, the administrator shall allow or deny the claim and give written notice of the decision to the claimant. If the claim is denied, the administrator shall inform the claimant of the reasons for the denial and specify what additional evidence is required before the claim will be allowed. The claimant may then file a new claim with the administrator or maintain an action under §18-28-216.

(c)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, within thirty (30) days after a claim is allowed, the property or the net proceeds of a sale of the property must be delivered or paid by the administrator to the claimant, together with any dividend, interest, or other increment to which the claimant is entitled under §§18-28-211 and18-28-212.

(2)

If in order to transfer property to the claimant under this section, fees or costs are required to be paid prior to transfer, the administrator may sell all or a portion of the property and deduct the costs of transfer from the proceeds of the sale, and any proceeds remaining shall be paid to the claimant.

(d)

A holder who pays the owner for property that has been delivered to the state and which, if claimed from the administrator by the owner would be subject to an increment under §§18-28-211 and18-28-212, may recover from the administrator the amount of the increment.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 15; 2005, No. 175, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (c) as present (c)(1); inserted the subdivision (c)(1) designation; inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section” in (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

18-28-216. Action to establish claim.

A person aggrieved by a decision of the administrator or whose claim has not been acted upon within ninety (90) days after its filing may maintain an original action to establish the claim in the Pulaski County Circuit Court, naming the administrator as a defendant. If the aggrieved person establishes the claim in an action against the administrator, the court may award the claimant reasonable attorney's fees.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 16.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former §18-28-216 was not repealed by Acts 1999, No. 850, § 33. In light of the enactment of the new subchapter, former §18-28-216 was recodified as §18-28-230.

18-28-217. Election to take payment or delivery.

(a)

The administrator may decline to receive property reported under this subchapter which the administrator considers to have a value less than the expenses of notice and sale.

(b)

A holder, with the written consent of the administrator and upon conditions and terms prescribed by the administrator, may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned. Property so delivered must be held by the administrator and is not presumed abandoned until it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 17.

18-28-218. Destruction or disposition of property having no substantial commercial value — Immunity from liability.

If the administrator determines after investigation that property delivered under this subchapter has no substantial commercial value, the administrator may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time. An action or proceeding may not be maintained against the state or any officer or against the holder for or on account of an act of the administrator under this section, except for intentional misconduct or malfeasance.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 18.

18-28-219. Periods of limitation.

(a)

The expiration, before or after July 30, 1999, of a period of limitation on the owner's right to receive or recover property, whether specified by contract, statute, or court order, does not preclude the property from being presumed abandoned or affect a duty to file a report or to pay or deliver or transfer property to the administrator as required by this subchapter.

(b)

An action or proceeding may not be maintained by the administrator to enforce this subchapter in regard to the reporting, delivery, or payment of property more than ten (10) years after the holder specifically identified the property in a report filed with the administrator or gave express notice to the administrator of a dispute regarding the property. In the absence of such a report or other express notice, the period of limitation is tolled. The period of limitation is also tolled by the filing of a report that is fraudulent.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 19.

18-28-220. Requests for reports and examination of records.

(a)

The administrator may require a person who has not filed a report, or a person who the administrator believes has filed an inaccurate, incomplete, or false report, to file a verified report in a form specified by the administrator. The report must state whether the person is holding property reportable under this subchapter, describe property not previously reported or as to which the administrator has made inquiry, and specifically identify and state the amounts of property that may be in issue.

(b)

The administrator, at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice, may examine the records of any person to determine whether the person has complied with this subchapter. The administrator may conduct the examination even if the person believes it is not in possession of any property that must be reported, paid, or delivered under this subchapter. The administrator may contract with any other person to conduct the examination on behalf of the administrator.

(c)

The administrator at reasonable times may examine the records of an agent, including a dividend disbursing agent or transfer agent, of a business association or financial association that is the holder of property presumed abandoned if the administrator has given the notice required by subsection (b) to both the association or organization and the agent at least ninety (90) days before the examination.

(d)

Documents and working papers obtained or compiled by the administrator, or the administrator's agents, employees, or designated representatives, in the course of conducting an examination are confidential and are not public records, but the documents and papers may be:

(1)

used by the administrator in the course of an action to collect unclaimed property or otherwise enforce this subchapter;

(2)

used in joint examinations conducted with or pursuant to an agreement with another state, the federal government, or any other governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;

(3)

produced pursuant to subpoena or court order; or

(4)

disclosed to the abandoned property office of another state for that state's use in circumstances equivalent to those described in this subdivision, if the other state is bound to keep the documents and papers confidential.

(e)

If an examination of the records of a person results in the disclosure of property reportable under this subchapter, the administrator may assess the cost of the examination against the holder at the rate of two hundred dollars ($200) a day for each examiner, or a greater amount that is reasonable and was incurred, but the assessment may not exceed the value of the property found to be reportable. The cost of an examination made pursuant to subsection (c) may be assessed only against the business association or financial organization.

(f)

If, after July 30, 1999, a holder does not maintain the records required by §18-28-221 and the records of the holder available for the periods subject to this subchapter are insufficient to permit the preparation of a report, the administrator may require the holder to report and pay to the administrator the amount the administrator reasonably estimates, on the basis of any available records of the holder or by any other reasonable method of estimation, should have been but was not reported.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 20.

18-28-221. Retention of records.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a holder required to file a report under §18-28-207 shall maintain the records containing the information required to be included in the report for ten (10) years after the holder files the report, unless a shorter period is provided by rule of the administrator.

(b)

A business association or financial organization that sells, issues, or provides to others for sale or issue in this state, traveler's checks, money orders, or similar instruments other than third-party bank checks, on which the business association or financial organization is directly liable, shall maintain a record of the instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the state and date of issue, for three (3) years after the holder files the report.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 21.

18-28-222. Enforcement.

The administrator may maintain an action in this or another state to enforce this subchapter. The court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the prevailing party.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 22.

18-28-223. Interstate agreements and cooperation — Joint and reciprocal actions with other states.

(a)

The administrator may enter into an agreement with another state to exchange information relating to abandoned property or its possible existence. The agreement may permit the other state, or another person acting on behalf of a state, to examine records as authorized in §18-28-220. The administrator by rule may require the reporting of information needed to enable compliance with an agreement made under this section and prescribe the form.

(b)

The administrator may join with another state to seek enforcement of this subchapter against any person who is or may be holding property reportable under this subchapter.

(c)

At the request of another state, the Attorney General of this state may maintain an action on behalf of the other state to enforce, in this state, the unclaimed property laws of the other state against a holder of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses incurred by the Attorney General in maintaining the action.

(d)

The administrator may request that the attorney general of another state or another attorney commence an action in the other state on behalf of the administrator. With the approval of the Attorney General of this state, the administrator may retain any other attorney to commence an action in this state on behalf of the administrator. This state shall pay all expenses, including attorney's fees, in maintaining an action under this subsection. With the administrator's approval, the expenses and attorney's fees may be paid from money received under this subchapter. The administrator may agree to pay expenses and attorney's fees based in whole or in part on a percentage of the value of any property recovered in the action. Any expenses or attorney's fees paid under this subsection may not be deducted from the amount that is subject to the claim by the owner under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 23.

18-28-224. Interest and penalties.

(a)

A holder who fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this subchapter shall pay to the administrator interest at the annual rate of two (2) percentage points above the bank prime loan rate as reported from time to time in the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System statistical release H.15 (Selected Interest Rates) or any successor publication on the property or value thereof from the date the property should have been reported, paid or delivered.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a holder who fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this subchapter, or fails to perform other duties imposed by this subchapter, shall pay to the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in subsection (a), a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) for each day the report, payment, or delivery is withheld, or the duty is not performed, up to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c)

A holder who willfully fails to report, pay, or deliver property within the time prescribed by this subchapter, or willfully fails to perform other duties imposed by this subchapter, shall pay to the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in subsection (a), a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the report, payment, or delivery is withheld, or the duty is not performed, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of any property that should have been but was not reported.

(d)

A holder who makes a fraudulent report shall pay to the administrator, in addition to interest as provided in subsection (a), a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day from the date a report under this subchapter was due, up to a maximum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus twenty-five percent (25%) of the value of any property that should have been but was not reported.

(e)

The administrator for good cause may waive, in whole or in part, interest under subsection (a) and penalties under subsections (b) and (c), and shall waive penalties if the holder acted in good faith and without negligence.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 24; 2005, No. 175, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “bank prime loan rate … any successor publication” for “annual rate of discount in effect on the date the property should have been paid or delivered for the most recent issue of fifty-two-week United States Treasury bills” in (a).

18-28-225. Agreement to locate property.

(a)

An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property that is presumed abandoned is void and unenforceable if it was entered into during the period commencing on the date the property was presumed abandoned and extending to a time that is twenty-four (24) months after the date the property is paid or delivered to the administrator. This subsection does not apply to an owner's agreement with an attorney to file a claim as to identified property or contest the administrator's denial of a claim.

(b)

An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property is enforceable only if the agreement is in writing, provides for a fee of not more than ten percent (10%) of the recovery, clearly sets forth the nature of the property and the services to be rendered, is signed by the apparent owner, and states the value of the property before and after the fee or other compensation has been deducted.

(c)

If an agreement covered by this section applies to mineral proceeds and the agreement contains a provision to pay compensation that includes a portion of the underlying minerals or any mineral proceeds not then presumed abandoned, the provision is void and unenforceable.

(d)

An agreement covered by this section which provides for compensation that is unconscionable is unenforceable except by the owner. An owner who has agreed to pay compensation that is unconscionable, or the administrator on behalf of the owner, may maintain an action to reduce the compensation to a conscionable amount. The court may award reasonable attorney's fees to an owner who prevails in the action.

(e)

This section does not preclude an owner from asserting that an agreement covered by this section is invalid on grounds other than unconscionable compensation.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 25.

18-28-226. Foreign transactions.

This subchapter does not apply to property held, due, and owing in a foreign country and arising out of a foreign transaction.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 26.

18-28-227. Transitional provisions.

(a)

An initial report filed under this subchapter for property that was not required to be reported before July 30, 1999, but which is subject to this subchapter must include all items of property that would have been presumed abandoned during the ten-year period next preceding July 30, 1999, as if this subchapter had been in effect during that period.

(b)

This subchapter does not relieve a holder of a duty that arose before July 30, 1999, to report, pay, or deliver property. Except as otherwise provided in §18-28-219(b), a holder who did not comply with the law in effect before July 30, 1999, is subject to the applicable provisions for enforcement and penalties which then existed, which are continued in effect for the purpose of this section.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 27.

18-28-228. Rules.

The administrator may adopt pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et. seq., rules necessary to carry out this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 28.

18-28-229. Uniformity of application and construction.

This subchapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this subchapter among states enacting it.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 850, § 29.

18-28-230. Periods of limitation not a bar.

Any statute of limitations that would vest the ownership of property subject to this subchapter in a holder of said property before expiration of a period of presumed abandonment is tolled until a demand is made by a party entitled to possession.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 256, § 15; 1985, No. 780, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-634; Acts 1997, No. 104, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former §18-28-216 was not repealed by Acts 1999, No. 850, § 33. In light of the enactment of the new subchapter, former §18-28-216 was recodified as this section.

18-28-231. Escheatment — United States savings bond.

(a)

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including §18-28-202(a)(10) and (14) and §18-28-219(b), a United States savings bond held or owing in this state is presumed abandoned if the savings bond remains unclaimed for five (5) years after the date of maturity of the United States savings bond.

(b)

If a United States savings bond is presumed abandoned under subsection (a) of this section, the United States savings bond shall escheat to the state two (2) years after becoming abandoned property according to subsections (c)-(f) of this section.

(c)(1)

If no claim for the United States savings bond is filed under §18-28-215, the administrator shall file a civil action for escheatment of the United States savings bond within one hundred eighty (180) days after the two-year period under subsection (b) of this section.

(2)

The administrator may postpone filing a civil action under subdivision (c)(1) of this section until additional United States savings bonds accumulate to justify the expense of the proceeding.

(d)

The administrator shall provide notice of the civil action to an individual named as a defendant in the civil action in the manner provided for under §16-3-101 et seq., and prescribed by Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(e)

If no person files a claim or appears at the hearing to substantiate a claim or if the court determines that a claimant is not entitled to the property claimed by the claimant, then the court shall enter judgment that:

(1)

The United States savings bond escheats to the state; and

(2)

All property rights and legal title to and ownership of the United States savings bond or proceeds from the United States savings bond, including all rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner, or beneficiary, are vested solely in the state.

(f)

Notwithstanding §§18-28-213 and18-28-225, the administrator shall redeem any United States savings bonds escheated to the state and deposit the proceeds recovered by the administrator into the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund.

(g)(1)

Notwithstanding §18-28-215(c), a person may file a claim with the administrator for a United States savings bond or the proceeds from the savings bond that has escheated to the state under this section.

(2)(A)

Upon submission of sufficient proof of the validity of a claim for a United States savings bond that has escheated to the state, the administrator may pay the claim after deducting the expense incurred by the administrator in securing full title and ownership of the United States savings bond by escheatment.

(B)

Upon payment of a valid claim, no action thereafter shall be maintained by any other claimant against the state for the funds.

(h)

The administrator may contract with and obtain outside legal counsel in the administration of this section.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 563, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Actions Involving Other States

18-28-301 — 18-28-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 850, § 33. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

18-28-301. Acts 1981, No. 850, § 1; 1985, No. 780, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-648.

18-28-302. Acts 1981, No. 850, § 2; 1985, No. 780, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-649; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 173, § 4.

18-28-303. Acts 1981, No. 850, § 3; 1985, No. 780, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-650.

Subchapter 4

— Mineral Proceeds

Cross References.

Natural resources and economic development, §15-1-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 3: June 12, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the counties of this state are in urgent need of funds to be used to finance the establishment and operation of solid waste disposal facilities, that this Act is designed to provide funds to assist the counties to provide this service and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 39, § 7: Nov. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, meeting in Third Extraordinary Session, that the appropriation of funds for the Unclaimed Mineral Proceeds Program of the Auditor of State, is essential to proper administration of this program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 325, § 4: Mar. 6, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that under the current provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, §18-28-201 et seq., the Auditor of State may not deposit unclaimed property funds with the State Treasurer for investment purposes; and that the unclaimed property funds are currently held in the Unclaimed Property Proceeds Trust Fund accruing minute interest; that the authority to invest funds in the State Treasury Money Management Trust will generate a greater financial return to be used for the benefit of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.